Massachusetts, session 194th, H1781.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 178I of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph, the following:-
“Upon the request of a victim who has enrolled in the board’s victim services unit, the
board shall inform the victim of the sex offender’s final classification, as well as the sex
offender’s home address, secondary address, work address and where the offender attends
school.”
of 1